arb-nouns.xfst
clear stack
!define TestWord
source arb-Alphabet.txt
define Alphabet
define PossNounStem [[Alphabet]^{2,24}] "+Guess":0;
source arb-NounAssim.txt
define NounAssim
source arb-NounAssimGuess.txt
define NounAssimGuess
define clIntermedLang [
"^ss^" -> [] ,
"+fem" -> [] ,
"+masc" -> [] ,
"+acc" -> [] ,
"+accgen" -> [] ,
"+dual" -> [] ,
"+pl" -> [] ,
"+defArt" -> [] ,
"^remya^" -> [] ,
"^se^" -> []
];
echo ">>> compile lexc"
read lexc < arb-nouns-lexc.txt
echo ">>> eliminate flags"
eliminate flag ART
eliminate flag CMPND
eliminate flag CASE
eliminate flag VERBAL
echo ">>> substitute defined"
substitute defined PossNounStem for "^GUESSNOUNSTEM^"
define AllInclusive
echo ">>> create attested"
read regex ~$["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. NounAssim  .o. clIntermedLang;
!read regex ~$["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. NounAssim  .o. TestWord .o. clIntermedLang;
!save stack arbf-NounAttested.fst
define ArbNouns
regex [[ArbNouns .o. $["rrr"] ] "+uncommon":0] .o. "rrr" -> [];
define rare
regex ArbNouns .o. ~$["rrr"];
define common
define ArbNouns [rare | common];
echo ">>> create guesser"
read regex $["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. NounAssimGuess;
!save stack arbf-NounGuesser.fst
define ArbNounsG
clear stack
